Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4316 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Any state educational institution within The Oklahoma State
System of Higher Education that constructs any building shall place
an amount equal to five percent (5%) of the total construction costs
in a general maintenance fund maintained by the state educational
institution.
B. The general maintenance fund shall be utilized for general
upkeep or maintenance of buildings owned by the state educational
Req. No. 15073 Page 1

inst itution. The funds placed in the general maintenance fund shall
not be limited or earmarked for the new construction which caused
the funds to be placed in the fund.
C. The funds required to be placed in a general maintenance
fund by subsection A of this section shall be in addition to all
other funds the state educational institution already allocates to a
general maintenance fund and shall not supplant or replace existing
funding levels.
D. The State Regents for Higher Education shall withhold all
state-appropriated funds from any state educational institution
which fails to comply with subsection A of this section until the
state educational institution comes into compliance with subsection
A of this section. The State Regents shall conduct annual audits of
state educational institutions to ensure compliance with this
section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-15073 AQH 01/08/26


Req. No. 15073 Page 2